Hawaii statutes.
§576B-210 Application of chapter to
nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction. A tribunal of this State
exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this
chapter, under other law of this State relating to a support order, or
recognizing a foreign support order may receive evidence from outside this
State pursuant to section 576B-316, communicate with a tribunal outside this
State pursuant to section 576B-317, and obtain discovery through a tribunal
outside this State pursuant to section 576B-318. In all other respects,
Articles 3 through 6 do not apply, and the tribunal shall apply the procedural
and substantive law of this State. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next